Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 618.141 is amended to read:
618.141. The license fees established pursuant to ORS 618.136 for commercial  weighing or
measuring instruments or devices may not exceed the following:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Discrete Weighing Devices Maximum
(Manufacturer’s rated capacity) Fee
Not over 400 pounds [$ 49] $68
Over 400 pounds,
but not over 1,160 pounds [$ 101] $134
Over 1,160 pounds,
but not over 7,500 pounds [$ 205] $270
Over 7,500 pounds,
but not over 60,000 pounds [$ 307] $404
Over 60,000 pounds [$ 307] $404
Static railroad track scales [$ 1,334] $1,730
Continuous Weighing Systems
(Manufacturer’s rated capacity)
Under 10 tons per hour [$ 386] $505
10-150 tons per hour [$ 600] $782
Over 150 tons per hour, but
not over 1,000 tons per hour [$ 1,201] $1,560
Over 1,000 tons per hour [$ 2,668] $3,456
In-motion railroad track scales [$ 1,334] $1,730
Enrolled House Bill 2806 (HB 2806-A) Page 1
Liquid-Fuel Metering Devices for
Noncorrosive Fuels Contained at
Atmospheric Pressure
(Maximum device flowrate)
Under 20 gallons per minute [$ 40] $59
20-150 gallons per minute [$ 205] $270
Over 150 gallons per minute [$ 307] $404
Special Liquid-Fuel Measuring
Equipment
(Type)
Liquefied petroleum gas meters
One inch pipe diameter or
under [$ 307] $404
Over one inch pipe diameter [$ 307] $404
Tanks, under 500 gallons
capacity when used as
measure containers with
or without gage rods or
markers $ 115
Tanks, 500 or more gallons
capacity when used as
measure containers with
or without gage rods or
markers $ 230
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding the three percent limit established by  ORS 618.136 (3) but
subject to the maximum limits under ORS 618.141,  the State Department of Agriculture may,
by rule, increase a license fee described in ORS 618.136 (1) by:
(1) For the  fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, up to 10 percent of the amount of the li-
cense fee for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025; and
(2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, up to 10 percent of the amount of  the li-
cense fee for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Section 4, chapter 385, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 4.  ORS 618.136, as amended by section 2, chapter 385, Oregon Laws  2019, is amended
to read:
618.136. (1) The license fee for  each type or class of commercial weighing or measuring instru-
ment or device shall be established by the State Department of Agriculture in an amount  not to
exceed the maximum limits under ORS 618.141. Such fees shall  be established in the amounts nec-
essary for the department to carry out and enforce the provisions of  ORS 618.010 to 618.246 relating
to the supervision of commercial weighing and measuring instruments or  devices, and to maintain
an emergency fund with an unencumbered balance in an amount not to exceed  the cost of adminis-
tering ORS 618.010 to 618.246 during a representative four-month period in order to  ensure the or-
derly supervision of commercial weighing and measuring instruments or devices within this state.
(2) License fees become past due July 1  each year for renewals, and on the date of first com-
mercial use for original installations.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection, the department may  not establish a license fee
under this section that is more than three percent higher than the license fee charged during
the preceding year for a commercial weighing or measuring instrument or device of the same
Enrolled House Bill 2806 (HB 2806-A) Page 2
type and class. Notwithstanding the three percent  limit but subject to the maximum limits
under ORS 618.141, when establishing a license fee  under this section the department may
round the fee amount to the next higher  whole dollar amount. The department may not
change the license fee for the same type and class of commercial weighing or measuring in-
strument or device more than once each year.
[(3)] (4) All moneys received by the department pursuant to  ORS 618.010 to 618.246 shall be paid
into the Department of Agriculture Service Fund. Such moneys are  continuously appropriated to the
department for the purpose of administering those provisions of ORS 618.010 to 618.246  relating to
testing, inspection, licensing and regulation of  commercial weighing and measuring instruments or
devices.
Passed by House June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2806 (HB 2806-A) Page 3